Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. New Business Incentive Program.

Sec. 45.81.010.
New business incentive fund.

There is established in the department the new business incentive fund. Up to $3,000,000 may be appropriated to the fund each fiscal year. The department may use money in the fund for new business incentive grants. On June 30 of each fiscal year, the unexpended and unobligated balance in the fund lapses into the general fund.

History.

(§ 2 ch 8 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska new business incentive program, see 3 AAC 59.

Sec. 45.81.020.
Eligibility for grants.

A new business or a business that is opening a new branch in the state is eligible for a new business incentive grant if

the business is primarily engaged in manufacturing a product for export outside of the state;

the business will not directly compete with an existing business that is located in the state as determined by the department;

for a business located in a municipality, the municipality has provided support to the business in a form and in an amount acceptable to the department;

the business is primarily financed by the private sector; and

the business has been recommended as complying with the requirements for a business incentive grant by the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority.

The department shall prescribe by regulation the standards for new business incentive grant eligibility and the form and procedure for submitting grant applications. Subject to the availability of money in the new business incentive fund, the department may award a grant to an eligible applicant in an amount that does not exceed the amount recommended by the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority for that applicant.

History.

(§ 2 ch 8 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska new business incentive program, see 3 AAC 59.

Sec. 45.81.030.
Use of grant money.

After awarding a new business incentive grant, the department may pay money from the grant to the recipient business only as reimbursement for one or more of the following costs incurred and paid by the business:

cost of relocating key personnel and of moving and installing equipment and initial inventory;

up to 50 percent of the cost of site preparation and installation of utilities for a new facility;

work force training costs for a period of up to 36 months in an amount not to exceed $5,000 for each employee receiving training during a 12-month period if the costs are not covered by another governmental program;

up to 50 percent of the costs of business feasibility analyses that relate to situations unique to the state, market studies applicable to the state, and business facility designs necessary to address conditions in the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 8 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska new business incentive program, see 3 AAC 59.

Sec. 45.81.040.
Grant conditions.

A business that receives a new business incentive grant must be operating on the date the grant is awarded and must continue to operate in the state for at least five years after the date the grant is awarded or must, within 90 days after ceasing to operate, repay the grant money together with interest on the money in an amount established by the department. A business that is a branch or subsidiary of another business may not receive a grant unless that other business agrees, in a form acceptable to the department, to be responsible for the obligation to repay grant money and interest under this subsection.

The department may set additional terms and conditions for the award of new business incentive grants and for the payment of grant money. The terms and conditions may include requirements for the repayment of grant money even though repayment is not required under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 8 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska new business incentive program, see 3 AAC 59.

Sec. 45.81.050.
Definition.

For purposes of AS

45.81.010

—

45.81.050

, “department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 2 ch 8 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska new business incentive program, see 3 AAC 59.